Utah statutes.
72-7-408.   Highway authority -- Restrictions on highway use -- Erection and
maintenance of signs designating restrictions -- Penalty.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), a highway authority may by  rule or
ordinance prescribe procedures and criteria which prohibit the operation of
any vehicle or impose restrictions on the weight of a vehicle upon any highway
under its jurisdiction.
(b)  A highway authority may impose restrictions for a highway under
Subsection (1)(a) if an engineering inspection concludes that, due to
deterioration caused by climatic conditions, a highway will be seriously
damaged or destroyed unless certain vehicles are prohibited or vehicle weights
are restricted.
(2)  The highway authority imposing restrictions under this section shall
erect signs citing the provisions of the rule or ordinance at each end of that
portion of any highway affected. The restriction is effective only when the
signs are erected and maintained.
(3)  Any person who violates any restriction imposed under the authority of
this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
